Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB980.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 6(a) and (b) of the act of September 27, 1961 (P.L.1700, No.699), known as the Pharmacy Act, are amended to read:Section 6. State Board of Pharmacy.--(a) Beginning with any vacancies existing on the effective date of this act, and as terms expire or vacancies occur thereafter, the State Board of Pharmacy shall consist of the Commissioner of Professional and Occupational Affairs, the Director of the Bureau of Consumer Protection in the Office of Attorney General, or his designee, two persons representing the public at large, [and five] six persons who are licensed to practice pharmacy in this 12345678910111213141516171819 Commonwealth [and who are not teachers or instructors in any educational institution teaching pharmacy.] and one person who is registered as a pharmacy technician with the board. Two pharmacists shall be appointed from independent retail pharmacies, two pharmacists shall be appointed who are employes of retail chain pharmacies which operate five or more pharmacies licensed within this Commonwealth and [one] two pharmacist shall be appointed from an acute care institutional pharmacy. Each pharmacist appointee must have been registered as a pharmacist for at least five years immediately preceding their appointment. The appointment of the pharmacy technician shall rotate between acute care institutional and independent or chain pharmacies. The pharmacy technician shall be registered with the board for at least five years immediately preceding their appointment or provide an attestation from a licensed pharmacist verifying the pharmacy technician has been working as a pharmacy technician in this Commonwealth for at least five years immediately preceding the appointment. All professional, pharmacy technician and public members of the board shall be appointed by the Governor with the advice and consent of a majority of the members elected to the Senate.(b) The terms of each professional, pharmacy technician and public member of the board shall be six years, or until a successor has been appointed and qualified, but not longer than six months beyond the six-year period. A pharmacy technician shall only be eligible to serve one six-year term. No other member shall be eligible for appointment to serve more than two consecutive terms. In the event that any [of said members] MEMBER OF THE BOARD shall die or resign or otherwise [becomes] BECOME disqualified during his or her term, a successor shall be 20250HB0980PN2422 - 2 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 appointed in the same way and with the same qualifications and shall hold office for the unexpired term. [No member shall be eligible for appointment to serve more than two consecutive terms.]* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0980PN2422 - 3 - 123456